test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_huksim_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - huksim:
    huksim+N+Sg+Nom: huksim
    huksim+N+Sg+Gen: huksim
    huksim+N+Sg+Acc: huksim
    huksim+N+Sg+Ill: huksiimân
    huksim+N+Sg+Loc: huksiimist
    huksim+N+Sg+Com: huksiimáin
    huksim+N+Sg+Abe: huksimttáá
    huksim+N+Ess: huksiimin
    huksim+N+Par: huksiimid
    huksim+N+Pl+Nom: huksiimeh
    huksim+N+Pl+Gen: huksiimij
    huksim+N+Pl+Acc: huksiimijd
    huksim+N+Pl+Ill: huksiimáid
    huksim+N+Pl+Loc: huksiimijn
    huksim+N+Pl+Com: [huksiimijguin, huksiimijgijn]
    huksim+N+Pl+Abe: huksiimijttáá

  Noun - kiddim:
    kiddim+N+Sg+Nom: kiddim
    kiddim+N+Sg+Gen: kiddim
    kiddim+N+Sg+Acc: kiddim
    kiddim+N+Sg+Ill: kiddiimân
    kiddim+N+Sg+Loc: kiddiimist
    kiddim+N+Sg+Com: kiddiimáin
    kiddim+N+Sg+Abe: kiddimttáá
    kiddim+N+Ess: kiddiimin
    kiddim+N+Par: kiddiimid
    kiddim+N+Pl+Nom: kiddiimeh
    kiddim+N+Pl+Gen: kiddiimij
    kiddim+N+Pl+Acc: kiddiimijd
    kiddim+N+Pl+Ill: kiddiimáid
    kiddim+N+Pl+Loc: kiddiimijn
    kiddim+N+Pl+Com: [kiddiimijguin, kiddiimijgijn]
    kiddim+N+Pl+Abe: kiddiimijttáá

  Noun - taŋkkam:
    taŋkkam+N+Sg+Nom: taŋkkam
    taŋkkam+N+Sg+Gen: taŋkkam
    taŋkkam+N+Sg+Acc: taŋkkam
    taŋkkam+N+Sg+Ill: taŋkkaamân
    taŋkkam+N+Sg+Loc: taŋkkaamist
    taŋkkam+N+Sg+Com: taŋkkaamáin
    taŋkkam+N+Sg+Abe: taŋkkamttáá
    taŋkkam+N+Ess: taŋkkaamin
    taŋkkam+N+Par: taŋkkaamid
    taŋkkam+N+Pl+Nom: taŋkkaameh
    taŋkkam+N+Pl+Gen: taŋkkaamij
    taŋkkam+N+Pl+Acc: taŋkkaamijd
    taŋkkam+N+Pl+Ill: taŋkkaamáid
    taŋkkam+N+Pl+Loc: taŋkkaamijn
    taŋkkam+N+Pl+Com: [taŋkkaamijguin, taŋkkaamijgijn]
    taŋkkam+N+Pl+Abe: taŋkkaamijttáá

  Noun - muorjim:
    muorjim+N+Sg+Nom: muorjim
    muorjim+N+Sg+Gen: muorjim
    muorjim+N+Sg+Acc: muorjim
    muorjim+N+Sg+Ill: muorjiimân
    muorjim+N+Sg+Loc: muorjiimist
    muorjim+N+Sg+Com: muorjiimáin
    muorjim+N+Sg+Abe: muorjimttáá
    muorjim+N+Ess: muorjiimin
    muorjim+N+Par: muorjiimid
    muorjim+N+Pl+Nom: muorjiimeh
    muorjim+N+Pl+Gen: muorjiimij
    muorjim+N+Pl+Acc: muorjiimijd
    muorjim+N+Pl+Ill: muorjiimáid
    muorjim+N+Pl+Loc: muorjiimijn
    muorjim+N+Pl+Com: [muorjiimijguin, muorjiimijgijn]
    muorjim+N+Pl+Abe: muorjiimijttáá

  Noun - merkkum:
    merkkum+N+Sg+Nom: merkkum
    merkkum+N+Sg+Gen: merkkum
    merkkum+N+Sg+Acc: merkkum
    merkkum+N+Sg+Ill: merkkuumân
    merkkum+N+Sg+Loc: merkkuumist
    merkkum+N+Sg+Com: merkkuumáin
    merkkum+N+Sg+Abe: merkkumttáá
    merkkum+N+Ess: merkkuumin
    merkkum+N+Par: merkkuumid
    merkkum+N+Pl+Nom: merkkuumeh
    merkkum+N+Pl+Gen: merkkuumij
    merkkum+N+Pl+Acc: merkkuumijd
    merkkum+N+Pl+Ill: merkkuumáid
    merkkum+N+Pl+Loc: merkkuumijn
    merkkum+N+Pl+Com: [merkkuumijguin, merkkuumijgijn]
    merkkum+N+Pl+Abe: merkkuumijttáá

  Noun - saneerim: # 4-syllabic but ok in this paradigm
    saneerim+N+Sg+Nom: saneerim
    saneerim+N+Sg+Gen: saneerim
    saneerim+N+Sg+Acc: saneerim
    saneerim+N+Sg+Ill: saneeriimân
    saneerim+N+Sg+Loc: saneeriimist
    saneerim+N+Sg+Com: saneeriimáin
    saneerim+N+Sg+Abe: saneerimttáá
    saneerim+N+Ess: saneeriimin
    saneerim+N+Par: saneeriimid
    saneerim+N+Pl+Nom: saneeriimeh
    saneerim+N+Pl+Gen: saneeriimij
    saneerim+N+Pl+Acc: saneeriimijd
    saneerim+N+Pl+Ill: saneeriimáid
    saneerim+N+Pl+Loc: saneeriimijn
    saneerim+N+Pl+Com: [saneeriimijguin, saneeriimijgijn]
    saneerim+N+Pl+Abe: saneeriimijttáá
